Missouri, session 2026, HB2834.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.133 and 561.026, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.133 and 561.026, to read as follows:
115.133. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, any citizen of the
United States who is a resident of the state of Missouri and seventeen years and six months of
age or older shall be entitled to register and to vote in any election which is held on or after
his or her eighteenth birthday.
2. No person who is adjudged incapacitated shall be entitled to register or vote. No
person shall be entitled to vote:
(1) While confined under a sentence of imprisonment[;
(2) While on probation or parole] after conviction of a felony[, until finally
discharged from such probation or parole]; or
[(3)] (2) After conviction of a felony or misdemeanor connected with the right of
suffrage.
3. Except as provided in federal law or federal elections and in section 115.277, no
person shall be entitled to vote if the person has not registered to vote in the jurisdiction of his
or her residence prior to the deadline to register to vote.
561.026. Notwithstanding any other provision of law except for section 610.140, a
person who is convicted:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2834 2
(1) Of [any offense] a felony shall be disqualified from registering and voting in any
election under the laws of this state while confined under a sentence of imprisonment;
(2) Of a felony or misdemeanor connected with the exercise of the right of suffrage
shall be forever disqualified from registering and voting;
(3) Of any felony shall be forever disqualified from serving as a juror.
✔